District of Columbia statutes.
11-924

Jurisdiction with respect to violations of the Rules and Regulations of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.

The Superior Court has jurisdiction with respect to any violation, committed in the District of Columbia, of the rules and regulations adopted by the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority under section 76(e) of title III of the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact.

History

June 4, 1976, 90 Stat. 674, Pub. L. 94-306, § 3(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-924.
1973 Ed., § 11-924.

References in Text

The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Regulation Compact, referred to at the end of this section, is codified in § 1-2431.